Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6116.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act may be cited as the "hospital cost review board act". (2) As used in this act, the words and phrases defined in sections 3 to 4 have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections. Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Board" means the hospital cost review board created in section 5. (b) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (c) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (d) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee. (e) "Health facility" means any of the following: (i) A health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260, including, but not limited to, a hospital. (ii) Any other facility or agency where a health professional provides a health service to a patient as a primary function of the facility or agency. (f) "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to provide a health service in the ordinary course of business or practice of a health profession. Health professional does not include a veterinarian. (g) "Health service" means any of the following: (i) Any care, service, or procedure provided by a health professional to diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical condition, or that affects the structure or function of the human body. (ii) Any ancillary product or service that is provided with a care, service, or procedure described in subparagraph (i). (h) "Hospital" means that term as defined in section 20106 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106. (i) "Income tax exemption" means any exemption from income tax under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. (j) "Medicaid" means the program of medical assistance established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-9, and administered under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. (k) "Medicare" means the federal Medicare program established under title XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395mmm. Sec. 4. (a) "Nonprofit hospital" means a hospital that meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is incorporated in this state under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192. (ii) Is recognized as tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. (b) "Person" means a corporation, partnership, association, governmental entity, or any other legal entity. (c) "Property tax exemption" means any exemption from ad valorem property taxation under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (d) "Prosperity region" means that term as defined in section 9130 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9130. (e) "Qualified hospital" means a nonprofit hospital that meets any of the following: (i) Is designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a critical access hospital. (ii) Is designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a rural emergency hospital. (iii) Is designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a sole community hospital. (iv) Is located in a rural area. (f) "Qualified third-party payer" means Medicare, Medicaid, or other public health care payment or benefits program. (g) "Rule" means a rule promulgated under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (h) "Rural area" means a county designated as rural by the Federal Office of Rural Health Policy. (i) "Sales tax exemption" means any exemption under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78, applicable to purchases made by the nonprofit hospital. (j) "Third-party payer" means a public or private health care payment or benefits program, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) A health insurer. (ii) A nonprofit health care corporation. (iii) A health maintenance organization. (iv) A preferred provider organization. (v) A nonprofit dental care corporation. (vi) A group health plan as that term is defined in section 21501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21501. (vii) Medicaid or Medicare. (k) "Use tax exemption" means any exemption under the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, applicable to the use, storage, or consumption of tangible personal property or taxable services by the nonprofit hospital. Sec. 5. (1) The hospital cost review board is created in the department. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the board must consist of the following 5 members: (a) One member appointed by the governor. (b) One member appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives. (c) One member appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by the senate majority leader. (d) One member appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by the minority leader of the house of representatives. (e) One member appointed by the governor from a list of nominees submitted by the senate minority leader. (3) Each member of the board must possess the following qualifications: (a) Have knowledge in health care policy or health care delivery or have expertise in business, finance, or accounting. (b) Have knowledge and experience that complements the other members appointed to the board. (c) Be impartial and have the ability to remain free from undue influence by a personal, business, or professional relationship with a person that is subject to the supervision of the board. (4) The governor shall appoint the first members of the board not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act. (5) The governor shall appoint the first members of the board to the following terms: (a) If the member is appointed under subsection (2)(d) or (e), to a 2-year term. (b) If the member is appointed under subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c), to a 4-year term. (6) After the first appointments to the board, the term of a member of the board is 4 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (7) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term in the same manner as the original appointment. (8) The governor may remove a member of the board for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (9) The director shall call the first meeting of the board. At the first meeting, the board shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The board shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 3 or more members. (10) Three members of the board constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by 3 members of the board serving is required for any action of the board. (11) The board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (12) Unless otherwise provided by law, confidential business information possessed or retained by the board in performing an official function is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. As used in this subsection, "confidential business information" means information that has not been publicly disseminated or that is unavailable from other sources, the release of which might cause a hospital harm. (13) A member of the board is not entitled to compensation for service on the board, but the board may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (14) The board shall perform the duties required of the board under this act and may perform any other duty or function provided to the board by law. Sec. 7. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a nonprofit hospital shall annually submit to the board all of the following information in a form and manner required by the board by rule: (a) The nonprofit hospital's financial information, including, but not limited to, all of the following, for the preceding calendar year: (i) Expenditures. (ii) Costs of operations. (iii) Revenues. (iv) Assets. (v) Liabilities. (vi) Information about payments to payers and purchasers, including, but not limited to, rates and charges, consistent with information subject to public disclosure under 45 CFR part 180. (vii) Labor costs by units of service and budget category. (b) Information on the scope of health services and volume of health service, including inpatient services, outpatient services, and ancillary services by type of service provider. (c) Utilization information. (d) An explanation for each category described in subdivision (a), outlining the changes in the year-over-year results and the actions that the hospital has taken and will take in the coming year to review the nonprofit hospital's budget. (e) The most recently available Medicare cost report. (f) All of the following: (i) An estimate of the total value of property tax exemptions received by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year, including exemptions for real and personal property. (ii) An estimate of the total value of sales tax exemptions and use tax exemptions claimed by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year for tangible personal property and services purchased or used, stored, or consumed. (iii) The amount of income taxes levied under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847, during the preceding calendar year. (iv) An estimate of the total value of income tax exemptions claimed by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year. (v) An estimate of the total value of any other state or federal tax exemption received by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year. (vi) A description of the methodology used to calculate the estimates under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iv), and (v). (g) The number of hospital beds currently operated by the owner of the nonprofit hospital in this state and by prosperity region. (h) A summary of any other health facilities that the owner of the nonprofit hospital currently owns, operates, or governs in this state and by prosperity region, divided by type of health facility. (i) Expenditures related to an acquisition or merger in accordance with the health facility consolidation prevention act. (j) Total capital investments and expenditures for maintaining and improving existing health facilities, and total expenditures for the purchase of new health facilities. (k) The most recent Form 990 filing with the Internal Revenue Service. (l) Any other information the board determines necessary or appropriate to fulfill its functions under this act. (2) Beginning January 1, 2027, a nonprofit hospital shall submit an audited financial statement to the board not later than 30 days after the audited financial statement becomes finalized. A nonprofit hospital shall submit an audited financial statement in a form and manner required by the board by rule. (3) A nonprofit hospital may submit with the information required under subsection (1), a clear and concise explanation of any of the following that led to an increase in a rate or charge by the nonprofit hospital: (a) A price increase by a medical device or equipment manufacturer. (b) A price increase by a drug manufacturer for a drug based on the actual payment made by the nonprofit hospital to the drug manufacturer. (c) Increased labor costs. (d) Any other cost increase that the nonprofit hospital considers relevant. (4) The information submitted under this section must comply with both of the following: (a) Include detailed and unambiguous data on increases in rates and charges across all health services and by each third-party payer or other person with which the nonprofit hospital has entered into a contract that regulates a rate or charge paid for a health service to the nonprofit hospital. (b) If the information is for an expenditure or cost, reflect the actual costs paid by the nonprofit hospital after all rebates and discounts. Sec. 9. (1) The board shall do all of the following: (a) Analyze and consider the information and audited financial statements submitted under section 7. (b) Meet with each nonprofit hospital in this state to review and discuss the nonprofit hospital's budget information. (c) Consider the salaries for the nonprofit hospital's executive and clinical leadership, whose compensation is publicly disclosed in the nonprofit hospital's Form 990 filings with the Internal Revenue Service. (d) Offer the public the opportunity to provide comment on nonprofit hospital budgets and other aspects of nonprofit hospital costs in this state. (e) Analyze and consider any other information received by the board under this act. (2) After performing its duties under subsection (1), the board may develop a written report making recommendations to the legislature on how to reduce nonprofit hospital spending in this state while promoting efficient and economic operations of nonprofit hospitals and maintaining the ability of nonprofit hospitals to meet their financial obligations and to provide quality care. (3) Unless otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, the department of health and human services, the department of insurance and financial services, and any other state department shall cooperate with the board and provide the board with information at the board's request. Sec. 11. (1) Subject to section 17, a nonprofit hospital shall comply with all of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the total price increase for all health services provided by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year must be uniformly applied to each third-party payer and other person with which the nonprofit hospital has entered into a contract that regulates a rate or charge paid for a health service and be justified by the nonprofit hospital's increased costs during the preceding calendar year. A total price increase is justified if the nonprofit hospital demonstrates to the board that the total price increase is directly caused by an increase in the cost of providing health services. This subdivision does not apply to a qualified third-party payer. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, each price increase for a health service provided by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year that is applied to a third-party payer or other person with which the nonprofit hospital has entered into a contract that regulates the rate or charge paid for that health service, must be justified by the nonprofit hospital's increased costs during the preceding calendar year. A price increase is justified if the nonprofit hospital demonstrates to the board that the price increase is directly caused by an increase in the cost of providing the health service that is the subject of the price increase. This subdivision does not apply to a qualified third-party payer. (c) Notwithstanding whether the total price increase is justified under subdivision (a), the total price increase for all health services provided by the nonprofit hospital during the preceding calendar year must not exceed the rate of inflation. As used in this subdivision, "rate of inflation" means the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as determined by the department, for the preceding calendar year. (2) If, after performing the functions described in section 9, the board determines that there is reason to believe that a nonprofit hospital is in violation of subsection (1), the board shall, within 30 days of that determination, notify the nonprofit hospital. The board shall endeavor to correct the violation through informal methods. If, after 30 business days, the board is unable to correct the violation through informal methods, the board may commence a hearing under subsection (3) to determine whether a violation has occurred. (3) A hearing under this section must be conducted as a contested case under chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. (4) If, after notice and a hearing, it is determined that a nonprofit hospital is in violation of subsection (1), the board shall issue an order directing the nonprofit hospital to pay an assessment in the amount of the estimated tax exemptions received by the hospital as reported to the board under section 7. (5) An order of the board following a hearing under this section is subject to judicial review as provided under chapter 6 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.301 to 24.306. Sec. 13. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and subject to section 17, not later than 14 days after the effective date of this act, a nonprofit hospital shall reduce its total prices for health services covered by third-party payers and other persons with which the nonprofit hospital has entered into a contract that regulates a rate or charge paid for a health service by 10%. The nonprofit hospital shall ensure that the reduction required under this subsection is uniformly applied to each third-party payer and other person with which the nonprofit hospital has entered into a contract that regulates a rate or charge paid for a health service. (2) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of this act, a nonprofit hospital shall submit documentation to the board on the nonprofit hospital's previous prices for health services and the adjusted total prices for health services under subsection (1) to verify its compliance with this section. The documentation must be submitted in a form and manner required by the board. (3) Subsection (1) does not apply to a qualified third-party payer. Sec. 15. (1) If a third-party payer is not paying in whole or in part for a health service provided to a patient at a nonprofit hospital, whether provided by an employee of the nonprofit hospital or by a health professional working in the nonprofit hospital, the nonprofit hospital shall not charge the patient more than 150% of the amount that Medicare would pay for the health service provided to the patient. (2) If a third-party payer is paying in whole or in part for a health service provided to a patient at a nonprofit hospital, whether provided by an employee of the nonprofit hospital or by a health professional working in the nonprofit hospital, the nonprofit hospital shall not charge the patient more than 200% of the amount that Medicare would pay for the health service provided to the patient. (3) This section is subject to section 17 and does not apply if no Medicare payment information exists for the health service provided to the patient. Sec. 17. If a contract is in effect as of the date of this act and that contract prevents compliance with section 11, 13, or 15, then section 11, 13, or 15, as applicable, does not apply until after the expiration of that contract. Sec. 19. The department shall deposit an assessment collected under this act with the state treasurer for deposit in the health care cost reduction fund created in the health care cost reduction fund act. Sec. 21. (1) The health care cost grant program is created, to be administered by the board. The board shall award grants to qualified hospitals that the board determines are experiencing unsustainable losses. A qualified hospital is considered to be experiencing an unsustainable loss if the qualified hospital has suffered a negative operating profit margin of not less than 3% for at least 3 consecutive years and the qualified hospital is not showing a clear sign of recovery, as determined by the board. In determining whether a hospital has suffered a negative operating profit margin, the board shall not consider a qualified hospital's losses on investment income. (2) A qualified hospital may apply for a grant under the grant program by completing an application on a form provided by the department. (3) The board shall prioritize the award of grants under this section to qualified hospitals that the board determines have the greatest need based on all of the following factors: (a) The number of patients served. (b) Whether the qualified hospital provides services that are unique to the area that the qualified hospital serves, the availability of other health care providers in the area served by the qualified hospital, and the distance that patients would have to travel if the qualified hospital closed. (c) The size and duration of the qualified hospital's operating losses. (d) The likelihood that a grant awarded under this section could prevent the closure of the qualified hospital. (e) The likelihood that the qualified hospital will return to a sustainable operation without receiving a grant under this section. (4) As a condition of receiving a grant under this section, a qualified hospital must agree to all of the following: (a) That the qualified hospital will not transfer the award to another health care provider. (b) That the qualified hospital will enter into a performance improvement agreement with the board. The performance improvement agreement may contain benchmarks for the qualified hospital based on information submitted to and reviewed by the board under this act. (c) That the qualified hospital will provide the board with information on the grant's impact on the qualified hospital's operating losses. (5) As used in this section, "health care provider" means a health professional and a health facility. Sec. 23. (1) By not later than April 1 of each year, the board shall submit a report to the department and the house of representatives and senate standing committees on health policy on the activities conducted by the board under this act. The report must include at least all of the following information: (a) For each qualified hospital awarded a grant under section 21, all of the following information: (i) The number of grants awarded to the qualified hospital during the year preceding the date of the report and the amount of each grant. (ii) The details of the performance improvement agreement. (iii) The impact of the grant on the qualified hospital's operating losses. (b) The number of violations of section 11, by hospital system. (c) The total price increases, by hospital system, and the justifications provided for the price increases under section 11. (d) The market share of hospital beds that each hospital system has by prosperity region and in this state. (e) Expenditures, by hospital system, related to capital investments for maintaining and improving existing facilities and the purchase of new facilities. (2) The department shall post a copy of the report required under this section on the department's website in an area that is accessible to the public. Sec. 25. The board shall promulgate rules to implement this act. The rules must include a schedule for nonprofit hospitals to submit the information required under this act, provide for uniform submission criteria, and promote the consistency of information provided by nonprofit hospitals under this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6117 (request no. H06751'26). (b) House Bill No. 6118 (request no. H06780'26).